District of Columbia statutes.
2-139

Inspector of Elevators and Fire Escapes.

One of the Assistant Inspectors of Buildings shall hereafter also perform the duties of Inspector of Elevators and Fire Escapes, without additional compensation.

History

Aug. 7, 1894, 28 Stat. 244, ch. 232

Cross References

Elevators, regulation of construction, repair and operation, see § 1-303.44.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1027.
1973 Ed., § 1-729.

New Implementing Regulations

New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1984: The “Apartment House Elevator Act of 1984” (D.C. Law 5-132, Mar. 13, 1985, 32 DCR 1717).